apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="crannt/each__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eacha</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ionn__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r>ionn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ionn</l>
          <r>ionn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ionnta</l>
          <r>ionn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ionnta</l>
          <r>ionn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ard/ú__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uithe</l>
          <r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uithe</l>
          <r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sagh/as__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sanna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="po/st__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ist</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ist</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="banfhái/dh__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>the</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dol__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="díshioc__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="saoth"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aoth</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oilbhéas"><par n="initial-o"/><i>ilbhéas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="saghas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>agh</i><par n="sagh/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uathordú"><par n="initial-u"/><i>athord</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="reigléas"><i>reigléas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athshonrú"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thshonr</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="feart"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eart</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ascalú"><par n="initial-a"/><i>scal</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="díshioc"><par n="initial-d"/><i>íshioc</i><par n="díshioc__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deasghnáth"><par n="initial-d"/><i>easghnáth</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="saorphost"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aorpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="praghas"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ragh</i><par n="sagh/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rangú"><i>rang</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mogh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ogh</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="teann"><par n="initial-t"/><i>eann</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ríomhphost"><i>ríomhpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="séad"><par n="initial-s"/><i>éad</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="urphost"><par n="initial-u"/><i>rpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="réad"><i>réad</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="crinnghréas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rinnghréas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dreach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>reach</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="easaontú"><par n="initial-e"/><i>asaont</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athrú"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thr</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tiomsú"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ioms</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="srath"><par n="initial-s"/><i>rath</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="glórphost"><par n="initial-g"/><i>lórpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="príomhphost"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ríomhpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seall"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eall</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ardú"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rd</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dea-bhéas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ea-bhéas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="triath"><par n="initial-t"/><i>riath</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uaillbhreas"><par n="initial-u"/><i>aillbhreas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="príomhchoincheap"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ríomhchoincheap</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="post"><par n="initial-p"/><i>o</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brugh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rugh</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dreas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>reas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stéad"><i>stéad</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ol</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muirdhreach"><par n="initial-m"/><i>uirdhreach</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="propast"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ropa</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="astú"><par n="initial-a"/><i>st</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="guthphost"><par n="initial-g"/><i>uthpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="troch"><par n="initial-t"/><i>roch</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="éag"><par n="initial-é"/><i>ag</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tréad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>réad</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="scol"><i>scol</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dramhphost"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ramhpho</i><par n="po/st__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deann"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eann</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="banfháidh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anfhái</i><par n="banfhái/dh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="easanálú"><par n="initial-e"/><i>asanál</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="smacht"><i>smacht</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="crannteach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rannt</i><par n="crannt/each__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="drochbhéas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>rochbhéas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="míbhéas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>íbhéas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ceard"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eard</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="treas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="coincheap"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oincheap</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lionn"><i>l</i><par n="l/ionn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tírdhreach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>írdhreach</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gréas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>réas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="féinmharú"><par n="initial-f"/><i>éinmhar</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="riailbhéas"><i>riailbhéas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="béas"><par n="initial-b"/><i>éas</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eisreachtú"><par n="initial-e"/><i>isreacht</i><par n="ard/ú__n_m"/></e>
